Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.160

Powers and duties.

The director of agriculture shall exercise all the powers and perform all the duties prescribed by law relating to commission merchants, livestock identification, livestock brand registration and inspection. All officers appointed to enforce these laws who have successfully completed a course of training prescribed by the Washington state criminal justice training commission shall have the authority generally vested in a peace officer solely for the purpose of enforcing these laws.

He or she shall enforce and supervise the administration of all laws relating to commission merchants, livestock identification and shall have the power to enforce all laws relating to any division under the supervision of the director of agriculture.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5108; 1983 c 248 s 10; 1967 c 240 s 13. Prior: 1965 c 8 s 43.23.160; prior: 1951 c 170 s 3.]